Idaho, session 2025, H0289.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 14, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1421, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1421. CERTIFIED REGISTERED NURSE ANESTHETIST. (1) For the purposes
of this section, "certified registered nurse anesthetist" or "CRNA" means
a licensed registered nurse who has graduated from a nationally accredited
graduate or post-graduate nurse anesthesia program and holds current certi-
fication as a nurse anesthetist from a national organization recognized by
the board. CRNAs are authorized to provide the full spectrum of anesthesia
care and related services to individuals across the lifespan, whose health
status may range across the wellness-illness continuum, including healthy
persons; persons with immediate, severe, or life-threatening illness or in-
jury; and persons with sustained or chronic health conditions.
(2) A CRNA shall be responsible for the care provided by the CRNA and for
obtaining professional liability insurance if the CRNA is not covered by the
facility or practice in which the CRNA works.
(3) A physician shall not be liable for civil damages arising out of any
act or omission relating to anesthesia services when:
(a) Such anesthesia services have been furnished solely and indepen-
dently by a CRNA acting within the scope of the CRNA's licensure, edu-
cation, training, and experience, and in compliance with all applicable
state and federal laws and rules; and
(b) The physician did not provide direct control or supervision or ex-
pressly assume responsibility for the anesthesia services provided by
the CRNA.
(4) The immunity from liability provided for in subsection (3) of this
section applies regardless of whether a physician is physically present in
the facility or practice setting where the CRNA is providing anesthesia ser-
vices as long as the physician did not undertake, accept, or contractually
agree to supervise or direct the CRNA's anesthesia care.
(5) Nothing in this section shall excuse or immunize a physician from
liability for:
(a) The physician's own acts of negligence, gross negligence, or will-
ful misconduct; or
(b) Any separate and independent professional services personally ren-
dered by the physician to a patient.


(6) Nothing in this section shall:
(a) Be interpreted to create any new requirement for physician super-
vision of CRNAs or to restrict the practice of any other licensed health
professional; or
(b) Affect or impair any requirement for facility accreditation, fed-
eral participation conditions for medicare or medicaid, or other regu-
latory standards that are not superseded by state law.
(7) The indemnity and immunity provided for in this section shall not
limit or alter the jurisdiction of the board or the Idaho state board of
medicine in regulating their respective licensees, nor shall it preclude the
application of any other provision of state law.
(8) If any provision of this section or its application to any person
or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other
provisions or applications of this section that can be given effect without
the invalid provision or application. To this end, the provisions of this
statute are declared to be severable.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.